Illinois, session 104th, HB3208.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-20.5a and 34-18 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.5a)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.5a)7    Sec. 10-20.5a. Access to high school campus. 8    (a) For school districts maintaining grades 10 through 12, 9to provide, on an equal basis, and consistent with the federal 10Educational Rights and Privacy Act, access to a high school 11campus and student directory information to the official 12recruiting representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and 13the United States, and State public institutions of higher 14education for the purpose of informing students of educational 15and career opportunities if the board has provided such access 16to persons or groups whose purpose is to acquaint students 17with educational or occupational opportunities available to 18them. The school board shall invite official recruiting 19representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the United 20States to hold a recruitment event on the high school campus at 21least once per school year. The board is not required to give 22greater notice regarding the right of access to recruiting 23representatives than is given to other persons and groups. In   HB3208- 2 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1this Section, "directory information" means a high school 2student's name, address, and telephone number. 3    (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian submits a 4signed, written request to the high school before the end of 5the student's sophomore year (or if the student is a transfer 6student, by another time set by the high school) that 7indicates that the student or his or her parent or guardian 8does not want the student's directory information to be 9provided to official recruiting representatives under 10subsection (a) of this Section, the high school may not 11provide access to the student's directory information to these 12recruiting representatives. The high school shall notify its 13students and their parents or guardians of the provisions of 14this subsection (b). 15    (c) A high school may require official recruiting 16representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the United 17States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a student's 18directory information in an amount that is not more than the 19actual costs incurred by the high school. 20    (d) Information received by an official recruiting 21representative under this Section may be used only to provide 22information to students concerning educational and career 23opportunities and may not be released to a person who is not 24involved in recruiting students for the armed forces of 25Illinois or the United States, or State institutions of higher 26education.  HB3208- 3 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    (e) By January 1, 2024, student directory information 2shall be made electronically accessible through a secure 3centralized data system for official recruiting 4representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the United 5States, and State public institutions of higher education. 6(Source: P.A. 103-204, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    (105 ILCS 5/34-18)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-18)8    Sec. 34-18. Powers of the board. The board shall exercise 9general supervision and jurisdiction over the public education 10and the public school system of the city, and, except as 11otherwise provided by this Article, shall have power:12        1. To make suitable provision for the establishment 13    and maintenance throughout the year or for such portion 14    thereof as it may direct, not less than 9 months and in 15    compliance with Section 10-19.05, of schools of all grades 16    and kinds, including normal schools, high schools, night 17    schools, schools for defectives and delinquents, parental 18    and truant schools, schools for the blind, the deaf, and 19    persons with physical disabilities, schools or classes in 20    manual training, constructural and vocational teaching, 21    domestic arts, and physical culture, vocation and 22    extension schools and lecture courses, and all other 23    educational courses and facilities, including 24    establishing, equipping, maintaining and operating 25    playgrounds and recreational programs, when such programs   HB3208- 4 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    are conducted in, adjacent to, or connected with any 2    public school under the general supervision and 3    jurisdiction of the board; provided that the calendar for 4    the school term and any changes must be submitted to and 5    approved by the State Board of Education before the 6    calendar or changes may take effect, and provided that in 7    allocating funds from year to year for the operation of 8    all attendance centers within the district, the board 9    shall ensure that supplemental general State aid or 10    supplemental grant funds are allocated and applied in 11    accordance with Section 18-8, 18-8.05, or 18-8.15. To 12    admit to such schools without charge foreign exchange 13    students who are participants in an organized exchange 14    student program which is authorized by the board. The 15    board shall permit all students to enroll in 16    apprenticeship programs in trade schools operated by the 17    board, whether those programs are union-sponsored or not. 18    No student shall be refused admission into or be excluded 19    from any course of instruction offered in the common 20    schools by reason of that student's sex. No student shall 21    be denied equal access to physical education and 22    interscholastic athletic programs supported from school 23    district funds or denied participation in comparable 24    physical education and athletic programs solely by reason 25    of the student's sex. Equal access to programs supported 26    from school district funds and comparable programs will be   HB3208- 5 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    defined in rules promulgated by the State Board of 2    Education in consultation with the Illinois High School 3    Association. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 4    Article, neither the board of education nor any local 5    school council or other school official shall recommend 6    that children with disabilities be placed into regular 7    education classrooms unless those children with 8    disabilities are provided with supplementary services to 9    assist them so that they benefit from the regular 10    classroom instruction and are included on the teacher's 11    regular education class register;12        2. To furnish lunches to pupils, to make a reasonable 13    charge therefor, and to use school funds for the payment 14    of such expenses as the board may determine are necessary 15    in conducting the school lunch program;16        3. To co-operate with the circuit court;17        4. To make arrangements with the public or 18    quasi-public libraries and museums for the use of their 19    facilities by teachers and pupils of the public schools;20        5. To employ dentists and prescribe their duties for 21    the purpose of treating the pupils in the schools, but 22    accepting such treatment shall be optional with parents or 23    guardians;24        6. To grant the use of assembly halls and classrooms 25    when not otherwise needed, including light, heat, and 26    attendants, for free public lectures, concerts, and other   HB3208- 6 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    educational and social interests, free of charge, under 2    such provisions and control as the principal of the 3    affected attendance center may prescribe;4        7. To apportion the pupils to the several schools; 5    provided that no pupil shall be excluded from or 6    segregated in any such school on account of his color, 7    race, sex, or nationality. The board shall take into 8    consideration the prevention of segregation and the 9    elimination of separation of children in public schools 10    because of color, race, sex, or nationality. Except that 11    children may be committed to or attend parental and social 12    adjustment schools established and maintained either for 13    boys or girls only. All records pertaining to the 14    creation, alteration or revision of attendance areas shall 15    be open to the public. Nothing herein shall limit the 16    board's authority to establish multi-area attendance 17    centers or other student assignment systems for 18    desegregation purposes or otherwise, and to apportion the 19    pupils to the several schools. Furthermore, beginning in 20    school year 1994-95, pursuant to a board plan adopted by 21    October 1, 1993, the board shall offer, commencing on a 22    phased-in basis, the opportunity for families within the 23    school district to apply for enrollment of their children 24    in any attendance center within the school district which 25    does not have selective admission requirements approved by 26    the board. The appropriate geographical area in which such   HB3208- 7 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    open enrollment may be exercised shall be determined by 2    the board of education. Such children may be admitted to 3    any such attendance center on a space available basis 4    after all children residing within such attendance 5    center's area have been accommodated. If the number of 6    applicants from outside the attendance area exceed the 7    space available, then successful applicants shall be 8    selected by lottery. The board of education's open 9    enrollment plan must include provisions that allow 10    low-income students to have access to transportation 11    needed to exercise school choice. Open enrollment shall be 12    in compliance with the provisions of the Consent Decree 13    and Desegregation Plan cited in Section 34-1.01;14        8. To approve programs and policies for providing 15    transportation services to students. Nothing herein shall 16    be construed to permit or empower the State Board of 17    Education to order, mandate, or require busing or other 18    transportation of pupils for the purpose of achieving 19    racial balance in any school;20        9. Subject to the limitations in this Article, to 21    establish and approve system-wide curriculum objectives 22    and standards, including graduation standards, which 23    reflect the multi-cultural diversity in the city and are 24    consistent with State law, provided that for all purposes 25    of this Article courses or proficiency in American Sign 26    Language shall be deemed to constitute courses or   HB3208- 8 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    proficiency in a foreign language; and to employ 2    principals and teachers, appointed as provided in this 3    Article, and fix their compensation. The board shall 4    prepare such reports related to minimal competency testing 5    as may be requested by the State Board of Education and, in 6    addition, shall monitor and approve special education and 7    bilingual education programs and policies within the 8    district to ensure that appropriate services are provided 9    in accordance with applicable State and federal laws to 10    children requiring services and education in those areas;11        10. To employ non-teaching personnel or utilize 12    volunteer personnel for: (i) non-teaching duties not 13    requiring instructional judgment or evaluation of pupils, 14    including library duties; and (ii) supervising study 15    halls, long distance teaching reception areas used 16    incident to instructional programs transmitted by 17    electronic media such as computers, video, and audio, 18    detention and discipline areas, and school-sponsored 19    extracurricular activities. The board may further utilize 20    volunteer nonlicensed personnel or employ nonlicensed 21    personnel to assist in the instruction of pupils under the 22    immediate supervision of a teacher holding a valid 23    educator license, directly engaged in teaching subject 24    matter or conducting activities; provided that the teacher 25    shall be continuously aware of the nonlicensed persons' 26    activities and shall be able to control or modify them.   HB3208- 9 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    The general superintendent shall determine qualifications 2    of such personnel and shall prescribe rules for 3    determining the duties and activities to be assigned to 4    such personnel;5        10.5. To utilize volunteer personnel from a regional 6    School Crisis Assistance Team (S.C.A.T.), created as part 7    of the Safe to Learn Program established pursuant to 8    Section 25 of the Illinois Violence Prevention Act of 9    1995, to provide assistance to schools in times of 10    violence or other traumatic incidents within a school 11    community by providing crisis intervention services to 12    lessen the effects of emotional trauma on individuals and 13    the community; the School Crisis Assistance Team Steering 14    Committee shall determine the qualifications for 15    volunteers;16        11. To provide television studio facilities in not to 17    exceed one school building and to provide programs for 18    educational purposes, provided, however, that the board 19    shall not construct, acquire, operate, or maintain a 20    television transmitter; to grant the use of its studio 21    facilities to a licensed television station located in the 22    school district; and to maintain and operate not to exceed 23    one school radio transmitting station and provide programs 24    for educational purposes;25        12. To offer, if deemed appropriate, outdoor education 26    courses, including field trips within the State of   HB3208- 10 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    Illinois, or adjacent states, and to use school 2    educational funds for the expense of the said outdoor 3    educational programs, whether within the school district 4    or not;5        13. During that period of the calendar year not 6    embraced within the regular school term, to provide and 7    conduct courses in subject matters normally embraced in 8    the program of the schools during the regular school term 9    and to give regular school credit for satisfactory 10    completion by the student of such courses as may be 11    approved for credit by the State Board of Education;12        14. To insure against any loss or liability of the 13    board, the former School Board Nominating Commission, 14    Local School Councils, the Chicago Schools Academic 15    Accountability Council, or the former Subdistrict Councils 16    or of any member, officer, agent, or employee thereof, 17    resulting from alleged violations of civil rights arising 18    from incidents occurring on or after September 5, 1967 or 19    from the wrongful or negligent act or omission of any such 20    person whether occurring within or without the school 21    premises, provided the officer, agent, or employee was, at 22    the time of the alleged violation of civil rights or 23    wrongful act or omission, acting within the scope of his 24    or her employment or under direction of the board, the 25    former School Board Nominating Commission, the Chicago 26    Schools Academic Accountability Council, Local School   HB3208- 11 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    Councils, or the former Subdistrict Councils; and to 2    provide for or participate in insurance plans for its 3    officers and employees, including, but not limited to, 4    retirement annuities, medical, surgical and 5    hospitalization benefits in such types and amounts as may 6    be determined by the board; provided, however, that the 7    board shall contract for such insurance only with an 8    insurance company authorized to do business in this State. 9    Such insurance may include provision for employees who 10    rely on treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone for 11    healing, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a 12    recognized religious denomination;13        15. To contract with the corporate authorities of any 14    municipality or the county board of any county, as the 15    case may be, to provide for the regulation of traffic in 16    parking areas of property used for school purposes, in 17    such manner as is provided by Section 11-209 of the 18    Illinois Vehicle Code;19        16. (a) To provide, on an equal basis, access to a high 20    school campus and student directory information to the 21    official recruiting representatives of the armed forces of 22    Illinois and the United States for the purposes of 23    informing students of the educational and career 24    opportunities available in the military if the board has 25    provided such access to persons or groups whose purpose is 26    to acquaint students with educational or occupational   HB3208- 12 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    opportunities available to them. The board shall invite 2    official recruiting representatives of the armed forces of 3    Illinois and the United States to hold a recruitment event 4    on the high school campus at least once per school year. 5    The board is not required to give greater notice regarding 6    the right of access to recruiting representatives than is 7    given to other persons and groups. In this paragraph 16, 8    "directory information" means a high school student's 9    name, address, and telephone number.10        (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian 11    submits a signed, written request to the high school 12    before the end of the student's sophomore year (or if the 13    student is a transfer student, by another time set by the 14    high school) that indicates that the student or his or her 15    parent or guardian does not want the student's directory 16    information to be provided to official recruiting 17    representatives under subsection (a) of this Section, the 18    high school may not provide access to the student's 19    directory information to these recruiting representatives. 20    The high school shall notify its students and their 21    parents or guardians of the provisions of this subsection 22    (b).23        (c) A high school may require official recruiting 24    representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the 25    United States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a 26    student's directory information in an amount that is not   HB3208- 13 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    more than the actual costs incurred by the high school.2        (d) Information received by an official recruiting 3    representative under this Section may be used only to 4    provide information to students concerning educational and 5    career opportunities available in the military and may not 6    be released to a person who is not involved in recruiting 7    students for the armed forces of Illinois or the United 8    States;9        17. (a) To sell or market any computer program 10    developed by an employee of the school district, provided 11    that such employee developed the computer program as a 12    direct result of his or her duties with the school 13    district or through the utilization of school district 14    resources or facilities. The employee who developed the 15    computer program shall be entitled to share in the 16    proceeds of such sale or marketing of the computer 17    program. The distribution of such proceeds between the 18    employee and the school district shall be as agreed upon 19    by the employee and the school district, except that 20    neither the employee nor the school district may receive 21    more than 90% of such proceeds. The negotiation for an 22    employee who is represented by an exclusive bargaining 23    representative may be conducted by such bargaining 24    representative at the employee's request.25        (b) For the purpose of this paragraph 17:26        (1) "Computer" means an internally programmed, general   HB3208- 14 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    purpose digital device capable of automatically accepting 2    data, processing data and supplying the results of the 3    operation.4        (2) "Computer program" means a series of coded 5    instructions or statements in a form acceptable to a 6    computer, which causes the computer to process data in 7    order to achieve a certain result.8        (3) "Proceeds" means profits derived from the 9    marketing or sale of a product after deducting the 10    expenses of developing and marketing such product;11        18. To delegate to the general superintendent of 12    schools, by resolution, the authority to approve contracts 13    and expenditures in amounts of $35,000 or less;14        19. Upon the written request of an employee, to 15    withhold from the compensation of that employee any dues, 16    payments, or contributions payable by such employee to any 17    labor organization as defined in the Illinois Educational 18    Labor Relations Act. Under such arrangement, an amount 19    shall be withheld from each regular payroll period which 20    is equal to the pro rata share of the annual dues plus any 21    payments or contributions, and the board shall transmit 22    such withholdings to the specified labor organization 23    within 10 working days from the time of the withholding;24        19a. Upon receipt of notice from the comptroller of a 25    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more, a 26    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more, the Cook   HB3208- 15 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 2    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 3    Chicago Transit Authority, or a housing authority of a 4    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more that a 5    debt is due and owing the municipality, the county, the 6    Cook County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 7    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 8    Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing authority by an 9    employee of the Chicago Board of Education, to withhold, 10    from the compensation of that employee, the amount of the 11    debt that is due and owing and pay the amount withheld to 12    the municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest 13    Preserve District, the Chicago Park District, the 14    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the Chicago 15    Transit Authority, or the housing authority; provided, 16    however, that the amount deducted from any one salary or 17    wage payment shall not exceed 25% of the net amount of the 18    payment. Before the Board deducts any amount from any 19    salary or wage of an employee under this paragraph, the 20    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 21    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 22    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 23    or the housing authority shall certify that (i) the 24    employee has been afforded an opportunity for a hearing to 25    dispute the debt that is due and owing the municipality, 26    the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the   HB3208- 16 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 2    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 3    authority and (ii) the employee has received notice of a 4    wage deduction order and has been afforded an opportunity 5    for a hearing to object to the order. For purposes of this 6    paragraph, "net amount" means that part of the salary or 7    wage payment remaining after the deduction of any amounts 8    required by law to be deducted and "debt due and owing" 9    means (i) a specified sum of money owed to the 10    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 11    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 12    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 13    or the housing authority for services, work, or goods, 14    after the period granted for payment has expired, or (ii) 15    a specified sum of money owed to the municipality, the 16    county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 17    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 18    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 19    authority pursuant to a court order or order of an 20    administrative hearing officer after the exhaustion of, or 21    the failure to exhaust, judicial review;22        20. The board is encouraged to employ a sufficient 23    number of licensed school counselors to maintain a 24    student/counselor ratio of 250 to 1. Each counselor shall 25    spend at least 75% of his work time in direct contact with 26    students and shall maintain a record of such time;  HB3208- 17 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1        21. To make available to students vocational and 2    career counseling and to establish 5 special career 3    counseling days for students and parents. On these days 4    representatives of local businesses and industries shall 5    be invited to the school campus and shall inform students 6    of career opportunities available to them in the various 7    businesses and industries. Special consideration shall be 8    given to counseling minority students as to career 9    opportunities available to them in various fields. For the 10    purposes of this paragraph, minority student means a 11    person who is any of the following:12        (a) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 13    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 14    America, including Central America, and who maintains 15    tribal affiliation or community attachment).16        (b) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 17    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 18    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 19    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 20    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam).21        (c) Black or African American (a person having origins 22    in any of the black racial groups of Africa).23        (d) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 24    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 25    culture or origin, regardless of race).26        (e) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a   HB3208- 18 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 2    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands).3        Counseling days shall not be in lieu of regular school 4    days;5        22. To report to the State Board of Education the 6    annual student dropout rate and number of students who 7    graduate from, transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual 8    programs;9        23. Except as otherwise provided in the Abused and 10    Neglected Child Reporting Act or other applicable State or 11    federal law, to permit school officials to withhold, from 12    any person, information on the whereabouts of any child 13    removed from school premises when the child has been taken 14    into protective custody as a victim of suspected child 15    abuse. School officials shall direct such person to the 16    Department of Children and Family Services or to the local 17    law enforcement agency, if appropriate;18        24. To develop a policy, based on the current state of 19    existing school facilities, projected enrollment, and 20    efficient utilization of available resources, for capital 21    improvement of schools and school buildings within the 22    district, addressing in that policy both the relative 23    priority for major repairs, renovations, and additions to 24    school facilities and the advisability or necessity of 25    building new school facilities or closing existing schools 26    to meet current or projected demographic patterns within   HB3208- 19 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    the district;2        25. To make available to the students in every high 3    school attendance center the ability to take all courses 4    necessary to comply with the Board of Higher Education's 5    college entrance criteria effective in 1993;6        26. To encourage mid-career changes into the teaching 7    profession, whereby qualified professionals become 8    licensed teachers, by allowing credit for professional 9    employment in related fields when determining point of 10    entry on the teacher pay scale;11        27. To provide or contract out training programs for 12    administrative personnel and principals with revised or 13    expanded duties pursuant to this Code in order to ensure 14    they have the knowledge and skills to perform their 15    duties;16        28. To establish a fund for the prioritized special 17    needs programs, and to allocate such funds and other lump 18    sum amounts to each attendance center in a manner 19    consistent with the provisions of part 4 of Section 20    34-2.3. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 21    require any additional appropriations of State funds for 22    this purpose;23        29. (Blank);24        30. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or 25    any other law to the contrary, to contract with third 26    parties for services otherwise performed by employees,   HB3208- 20 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    including those in a bargaining unit, and to lay off 2    layoff those employees upon 14 days' days written notice 3    to the affected employees. Those contracts may be for a 4    period not to exceed 5 years and may be awarded on a 5    system-wide basis. The board may not operate more than 30 6    contract schools, provided that the board may operate an 7    additional 5 contract turnaround schools pursuant to item 8    (5.5) of subsection (d) of Section 34-8.3 of this Code, 9    and the governing bodies of contract schools are subject 10    to the Freedom of Information Act and Open Meetings Act;11        31. To promulgate rules establishing procedures 12    governing the layoff or reduction in force of employees 13    and the recall of such employees, including, but not 14    limited to, criteria for such layoffs, reductions in force 15    or recall rights of such employees and the weight to be 16    given to any particular criterion. Such criteria shall 17    take into account factors, including, but not limited to, 18    qualifications, certifications, experience, performance 19    ratings or evaluations, and any other factors relating to 20    an employee's job performance;21        32. To develop a policy to prevent nepotism in the 22    hiring of personnel or the selection of contractors;23        33. (Blank); and24        34. To establish a Labor Management Council to the 25    board comprised of representatives of the board, the chief 26    executive officer, and those labor organizations that are   HB3208- 21 -LRB104 10298 LNS 20372 b1    the exclusive representatives of employees of the board 2    and to promulgate policies and procedures for the 3    operation of the Council.4    The specifications of the powers herein granted are not to 5be construed as exclusive, but the board shall also exercise 6all other powers that may be requisite or proper for the 7maintenance and the development of a public school system, not 8inconsistent with the other provisions of this Article or 9provisions of this Code which apply to all school districts.10    In addition to the powers herein granted and authorized to 11be exercised by the board, it shall be the duty of the board to 12review or to direct independent reviews of special education 13expenditures and services. The board shall file a report of 14such review with the General Assembly on or before May 1, 1990.15(Source: P.A. 102-465, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-17-24.)